Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Pari-Mutuel Wagering

230.361.
Regulation of pari-mutuel wagering — Authorized operation not grounds for revocation or suspension of temporary alcoholic beverage license — Tickets presumed abandoned — License for special charitable events.

The racing commission shall promulgate administrative regulations governing and regulating mutuel wagering on horse races under what is known as the pari-mutuel system of wagering.

The wagering shall be conducted only by a person licensed under this chapter to conduct a race meeting and only upon the licensed premises, and provided further that only pari-mutuel wagering on simulcasting shall be allowed at simulcast facilities.

The pari-mutuel system of wagering shall be operated only by a totalizator or other mechanical equipment approved by the racing commission. The racing commission shall not require any particular make of equipment.

The operation of a pari-mutuel system for betting where authorized by law shall not constitute grounds for the revocation or suspension of any license issued and held under KRS

242.1238

and

243.265

.

All reported but unclaimed pari-mutuel winning tickets held in this state by any person or association operating a pari-mutuel or similar system of betting at horse race meetings shall be presumed abandoned if not claimed by the person entitled to them within one (1) year from the time the ticket became payable.

The racing commission may issue a license to conduct pari-mutuel wagering on steeple chases or other racing over jumps; if all proceeds from the wagering, after expenses are deducted, is used for charitable purposes. If the dates requested for such a license have been granted to a track within a forty (40) mile radius of the race site, the racing commission shall not issue a license until it has received written approval from the affected track. Pari-mutuel wagering licensed and approved under this subsection shall be limited to four (4) days per year. All racing and wagering authorized by this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with applicable administrative regulations promulgated by the racing commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 184, § 14; 1974, ch. 403, § 7; 1978, ch. 307, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 100, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 214, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 376, § 8, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 109, § 25, effective March 30, 1992; 1998, ch. 237, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 191, § 16, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 460, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 102, effective June 25, 2013; 2021 ch. 8, § 2, effective February 22, 2021.

230.3611.
Limitation on pools. [Repealed.]

230.3615.
Limitation on commission of operator of Thoroughbred race track — Breaks — Payment for backside improvement fund.

The commission, including the tax levied in KRS

138.510

, deducted from the gross amount wagered by the association which operates a race track under the jurisdiction of the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission and conducts the Thoroughbred racing at which betting is conducted through a pari-mutuel or other similar system, in races where the patron is required to select one (1) horse, and the breaks, which breaks shall be made and calculated to the penny, except on races previously run in which the breaks shall be made and calculated to the penny or retained in the pari-mutuel pools, shall not be more than seventeen and one-half percent (17.5%).

The commission, including the tax levied in KRS

138.510

, deducted from the gross amount wagered by the person, corporation, or association which operates a race track under the jurisdiction of the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission and conducts Thoroughbred racing at which betting is conducted through a pari-mutuel or other similar system shall not exceed twenty-two percent (22%) of the gross handle in races where the patron is required to select two (2) or more horses, and the breaks, which breaks shall be made and calculated to the penny, except on races previously run in which the breaks shall be made and calculated to the penny or retained in the pari-mutuel pools.

The minimum wager to be accepted by any licensed association shall be ten cents ($0.10). The minimum pay-off on a one dollar ($1) wager shall be one dollar and ten cents ($1.10); but, in the event of a minus pool, the minimum pay-off for a one dollar ($1) wager shall be one dollar and five cents ($1.05).

Each association conducting Thoroughbred racing shall pay to the racing commission all moneys allocated to the backside improvement fund in an amount equal to one-half of one percent (0.5%) of its on-track pari-mutuel wagers.

History.

Repealed and reenact. Acts 1992, ch. 109, § 8, effective March 30, 1992; 2004, ch. 191, § 17, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 80, § 9, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 461, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 124, § 18, effective July 14, 2022.

230.362.
Report of unclaimed pari-mutuel winning tickets presumed abandoned.

Any person holding unclaimed pari-mutuel winning tickets presumed abandoned under the provisions of KRS

230.361

shall file annually, on or before September 1 of each year, with the office of the racing commission a list of and the amounts represented by unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets held by such person as of July 1, and other information as the racing commission may require for the administration of KRS

230.361

to

230.373

. The report shall be made in duplicate; the original shall be retained by the racing commission and the copy shall be mailed to the sheriff of the county where the unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets are held. It shall be the duty of the sheriff to post for not less than twenty (20) consecutive days a copy of the report on the courthouse door or the courthouse bulletin board, and to publish the copy in the manner set forth by KRS Chapter 424. The cost of the publication shall be paid by the racing commission. The sheriff shall immediately certify in writing to the racing commission the dates when the list was posted and published. The list shall be posted and published as required on or before October 1 of the year when it is made, and such posting and publishing shall be constructive notice to all holders of pari-mutuel tickets which have remained unclaimed for a period of one (1) year from the time the ticket became payable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 223, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 237, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 191, § 18, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 462, effective July 15, 2010.

230.363.
Money to be turned over to racing commission.

Any person who has made a report of unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets to the racing commission as required by KRS

230.362

shall, between November 1 and November 15 of each year, turn over to the racing commission the sum represented by the unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets so reported; but if the person making the report or the owner of the unclaimed pari-mutuel ticket certifies to the racing commission by sworn statement that any or all of the statutory conditions necessary to create a presumption of abandonment no longer exists or never did exist, or shall certify existence of any fact or circumstance in which there is substantial evidence to rebut such presumption, then, the person reporting the unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets or holding the sum represented by the unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets as reported shall not be required to turn over said sum to the racing commission except upon order of court. If the holder of any unclaimed pari-mutuel ticket files an action in court claiming the sum which has been reported under the provisions of KRS

230.362

, the person reporting or holding the sum represented by said unclaimed pari-mutuel ticket shall be under no duty while any such action is pending to turn over said sum to the racing commission, but shall have the duty of notifying the racing commission of the pendency of such action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 191, § 19, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 463, effective July 15, 2010.

230.364.
Judicial determination of rights.

Any person holding an unclaimed pari-mutuel ticket or any person holding the sum represented by an unclaimed pari-mutuel ticket, or any claimant thereto shall have the right to a judicial determination of his rights under KRS

230.361

to

230.373

and nothing therein shall be construed otherwise; and the racing commission may institute an action to recover the sum represented by the unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets which are presumed abandoned whether said sum has been reported or not and may include in one (1) petition the sum represented by all the unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets as defined herein within the jurisdiction of the court in which the action is brought.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 191, § 20, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 464, effective July 15, 2010.

230.365.
Payment to racing commission relieves person of claims liability.

Any person who pays the sum represented by the unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets to the racing commission under KRS

230.363

is relieved of all liability for the value of said unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets for any claim made in respect of said unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 191, § 21, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 465, effective July 15, 2010.

230.366.
Person claiming interest in unclaimed ticket may file claim after payment to racing commission.

Any person claiming an interest in any unclaimed pari-mutuel ticket which has been paid or surrendered to the racing commission in accordance with KRS

230.361

to

230.373

may file his claim to it at any time after it was paid to the racing commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 191, § 22, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 466, effective July 15, 2010.

230.367.
Racing Commission’s procedure on filing of claim — Payment.

The racing commission shall consider any claim or defense permitted to be filed before the racing commission and hear the evidence concerning it. If the claimant establishes his claim, the racing commission shall, when the time for appeal or other legal procedure has expired, authorize payment to him of a sum equal to the amount of his claim paid to the racing commission in accordance with KRS

230.361

to

230.373

. The decision shall be in writing and shall state the substance of the evidence heard by the racing commission, if a transcript is not kept. The decision shall be a matter of public record.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 191, § 23, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 467, effective July 15, 2010.

230.368.
Appeals.

Any person dissatisfied with the decision of the racing commission under KRS

230.367

may appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 191, § 24, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 468, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 62, § 118, effective June 29, 2017.

230.369.
Examination of records.

The racing commission, through its employees, may examine all records of any person where there is reason to believe that there has been or is a failure to report unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 191, § 25, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 469, effective July 15, 2010.

230.370.
Racing Commission may promulgate administrative regulations.

The racing commission may promulgate any reasonable and necessary administrative regulation for the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter and the conduct of hearings held before it.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 10, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 109, § 26, effective March 30, 1992; 2004, ch. 191, § 26, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 470, effective July 15, 2010.

230.371.
Production of reports and surrender of money — Penalty.

The racing commission may require the production of reports or the surrender of sums represented by unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets as provided in KRS

230.361

to

230.373

by civil equity action, including, but not limited to, an action in the nature of a bill of discovery, in which case the defendant shall pay a penalty equal to ten percent (10%) of all amounts that he is ultimately required to surrender. The racing commission shall follow the procedures provided by the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 191, § 27, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 471, effective July 15, 2010.

230.372.
Costs — Payments.

Any payments made to any persons claiming an interest in an unclaimed pari-mutuel ticket, and any necessary expense including, but not limited to, administrative costs, advertising costs, court costs and attorney’s fees, required to be paid by the racing commission in administering or enforcing the provisions of KRS

230.361

to

230.373

shall be deducted from sums received by the racing commission prior to payment to the Kentucky Racing Health and Welfare Fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 191, § 28, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 472, effective July 15, 2010.

230.373.
Limitations for persons under disability.

Any holder of unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets affected by KRS

230.361

to

230.373

under disability shall have five (5) years after the disability is removed in which to take any action or procedure or make any defense allowed to one sui juris.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 13, effective June 17, 1978.

230.374.
Payments to Kentucky Racing Health and Welfare Fund, Inc.

All sums reported and paid to the racing commission under the provisions of KRS

230.361

to

230.373

, with the exception of funds paid under KRS

230.398

, shall be paid by the racing commission to the Kentucky Racing Health and Welfare Fund, Inc., a nonprofit charitable corporation, organized for the benefit, aid, assistance, and relief of Thoroughbred owners, trainers, jockeys, valets, exercise riders, grooms, stable attendants, pari-mutuel clerks, and other Thoroughbred racing personnel employed in connection with racing, and their spouses and children, who can demonstrate their need for financial assistance connected with death, illness, or off-the-job injury and are not otherwise covered by union health and welfare plans, workers’ compensation, Social Security, public welfare, or any type of health, medical, death, or accident insurance. These sums shall be paid on or before December 31 in each year, however, no payments shall be made by the racing commission to the Kentucky Racing Health and Welfare Fund, Inc., unless the racing commission and the Auditor of Public Accounts are satisfied that the fund is in all respects being operated for the charitable and benevolent purposes as set forth in this section and that no part of the funds paid to the fund by the racing commission or any net earnings of the fund inure to the benefit of any private individual, director, officer, or member of the fund or any of the persons who turned over sums to the racing commission representing unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 307, § 14, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 214, § 8, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 376, § 9, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 109, § 27, effective March 30, 1992; 1998, ch. 237, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 191, § 29, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 473, effective July 15, 2010.

230.375.
Kentucky Race Track Retirement Plan.

The board of directors of the Kentucky Racing Health and Welfare Fund, Inc., may create and fund the Kentucky Race Track Retirement Plan. The board shall use no more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the annual sum paid by the racing commission under KRS

230.361

to

230.373

to fund the plan.

The plan shall be provided for the benefit of Thoroughbred trainers, assistant trainers, exercise riders, grooms, stable attendants, and other stable employees who can demonstrate that they are not otherwise eligible to participate in any other private or public, nonself-funded retirement or pension plan.

The Kentucky Race Track Retirement Plan shall be administered by the board of directors of the Kentucky Racing Health and Welfare Fund, Inc., for the charitable and benevolent purposes set forth in KRS

230.374

, and no part of the sums administered by the fund for the plan or any net earnings of the plan shall inure to the benefit of any private individual, director, officer, or member of the fund, or any of the persons who paid sums to the racing commission under the provisions of KRS

230.361

to

230.373

.

The board of directors of the Kentucky Racing Health and Welfare Fund, Inc., shall be the trustee of the plan’s funds and shall have full power to invest and reinvest funds. Investments shall be diversified to balance the risks associated with various investment options to maintain the long-term solvency of the plan. The board shall have full power to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, or dispose of any of the investments in which any of the plan’s funds have been invested, as well as of the proceeds of investments belonging to the plan. The board members or any investment manager shall discharge their duties with respect to the assets of the plan solely in the interest of the plan’s members and:

For the exclusive purposes of providing benefits to plan members and their beneficiaries and defraying reasonable expenses of administering the plan;

With the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with these matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims; and

In accordance with any other laws or instruments governing the administration of the plan’s funds.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 447, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 191, § 30, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 474, effective July 15, 2010.